Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.093

Hearings—Duties of prosecuting attorney or attorney general.

It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney to act in proceedings relating to the commission of a juvenile offense as provided in RCW 13.40.070 and 13.40.090 and in proceedings as provided in chapter 71.34 RCW. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney to handle delinquency cases under chapter 13.24 RCW and it shall be the duty of the attorney general to handle dependency cases under chapter 13.24 RCW. It shall be the duty of the attorney general in contested cases brought by the department to present the evidence supporting any petition alleging dependency or seeking the termination of a parent and child relationship or any contested case filed under RCW 26.33.100 or approving or disapproving out-of-home placement: PROVIDED, That in each county with a population of less than two hundred ten thousand, the attorney general may contract with the prosecuting attorney of the county to perform the duties of the attorney general under this section.

[ 1995 c 312 s 41; 1991 c 363 s 11; 1985 c 354 s 30; 1985 c 7 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 165 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 9.]

NOTES:

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.